District of Columbia statutes.
6-341.05

Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, the terms “Agency,” “lessee,” “purchaser,” “real property,” “redevelopment,” and “redevelopment company” shall have the respective meanings provided for such terms by § 6-301.02 [repealed].

History

Nov. 2, 1965, 79 Stat. 1185, Pub. L. 89-317, § 5

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-840.
1973 Ed., § 5-737.